District of Columbia statutes.
31-4603

Severability.

Should any section or provision of this subdivision be decided by the courts to be unconstitutional or invalid, the validity of this subdivision as a whole or of any part thereof other than the part decided to be unconstitutional shall not be affected.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1177, ch. 672, ch. VI, § 3
Hospital and medical services corporations, applicability of this section, see § 31-3503.
1981 Ed., § 35-802.
1973 Ed., § 35-803.